Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.04
Auction, defined.

Auction means
a sale of motor vehicles and trailers of types required to be registered in
this state, except such vehicles as are eligible for registration pursuant
to section 60-3,198, sold or offered for sale at which the price offered is
increased by the prospective buyers who bid against one another, the highest
bidder becoming the purchaser. The holding of a farm auction or an occasional
motor vehicle or trailer auction of not more than two auctions in a calendar
year does not constitute an auction subject to the Motor Vehicle Industry
Regulation Act.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 16.